Washington statutes.
RCW 41.44.140

Retirement for service.

Retirement of a member for service shall be made by the board as follows:

(1) Each member included in the miscellaneous personnel in service on the effective date, who, on or before such effective date, has attained the age of sixty-five years or over shall be compulsorily retired forthwith: PROVIDED, That there shall be no compulsory retirements for a period of two years immediately following the effective date, but any member having attained the age of sixty-five may voluntarily retire at any time after attaining such age. Members included in the miscellaneous personnel attaining age sixty-five after effective date shall be retired on the first day of the calendar month next succeeding the month in which the member shall have attained sixty-five, but none of such members shall be subject to compulsory retirement until two years after the effective date. The legislative authority of the city shall have the privilege at all times of extending time for retirement of any such member to his or her attainment of any age not exceeding age seventy: PROVIDED, That any such extension shall not increase the retirement age of such member in excess of one year at a time.

(2) Any member included in the miscellaneous personnel may retire by filing with the board a written application duly attested, setting forth on what date he or she desires to be retired, such application to be made at least thirty days prior to date of retirement: PROVIDED, That said member, at the time specified for his or her retirement, shall have attained the age of sixty years, or shall have thirty years of creditable service regardless of attained age: PROVIDED FURTHER, That during the two years immediately following the effective date voluntary service retirement of such members under sixty-two years of age shall not be granted.

(3) Each member included in the uniformed personnel in service on the effective date who on or before such effective date has attained the minimum age for social security benefits shall be compulsorily retired forthwith: PROVIDED, That there shall be no compulsory service retirements for a period of two years immediately following the effective date, but any such member having attained the minimum age for social security benefits may voluntarily retire at any time after attaining such age. Members included in the uniformed personnel attaining the minimum age for social security benefits after the effective date shall be retired on the first day of the calendar month next succeeding the month in which the members shall have attained the minimum age for social security benefits, but none of such members shall be subject to compulsory retirement until two years after the effective date. The legislative authority shall have the privilege at all times of extending time for retirement of any such member: PROVIDED, That any such extension shall not increase the retirement age of such member in excess of one year at a time.

(4) Any member included in the uniformed personnel may retire by filing with the board a written application duly attested, setting forth on what date he or she desires to be retired, such application to be made at least thirty days prior to date of retirement: PROVIDED, That said members, at the time specified for retirement, shall have twenty-five years of creditable service regardless of age, or shall have attained the age of fifty-five years regardless of years of creditable service: PROVIDED FURTHER, That during the two years immediately following the effective date voluntary service retirement of such members under the minimum age for social security benefits shall not be granted.

(5) After the retirement of any employee, any member city, by unanimous vote of its legislative body and with the consent of the board, may reemploy or retain such employee in its service to fill a supervisory or key position.

[ 2012 c 117 s 67; 1967 ex.s. c 28 s 4; 1965 ex.s. c 99 s 4; 1961 c 227 s 5; 1953 c 228 s 5; 1951 c 275 s 10; 1947 c 71 s 14; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9592-143.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Severability—1967 ex.s. c 28: See notes following RCW 41.44.030.